Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-104.04
Commission on the status of women; establish; fund.

Any county may establish and fund a commission on the status of women. Such commission shall advise the county board on the existence of social, economic, and legal barriers affecting women and ways to eliminate such barriers.

Laws 1980, LB 780, § 1.